Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-919.03
Court on hearing officers; state agency actions.

In actions brought by or against state agencies, after applying all customary tools of interpretation of a statute or rule or regulation, the court or hearing officer shall resolve any remaining doubt in favor of a reasonable interpretation which is consistent with an individual's fundamental constitutional rights.

Laws 2024, LB43, § 14.
July 19, 2024